District of Columbia statutes.
49-804

System of discipline and field exercise.

The system of discipline and field exercise ordered to be observed by the Army of the United States, or such other system as may be directed for the militia by laws of the United States, shall be observed by the National Guard.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328, § 61
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 69
1981 Ed., § 39-904.
1973 Ed., § 39-904.